Washington statutes.
RCW 43.88.010

Purpose—Intent.

It is the purpose of this chapter to establish an effective state budgeting, accounting, and reporting system for all activities of the state government, including both capital and operating expenditures; to prescribe the powers and duties of the governor as these relate to securing such fiscal controls as will promote effective budget administration; and to prescribe the responsibilities of agencies of the executive branch of the state government.

It is the intent of the legislature that the powers conferred by this chapter, as amended, shall be exercised by the executive in cooperation with the legislature and its standing, special, and interim committees in its status as a separate and coequal branch of state government.

[ 1986 c 215 s 1; 1981 c 270 s 1; 1973 1st ex.s. c 100 s 1; 1965 c 8 s 43.88.010. Prior: 1959 c 328 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1981 c 270: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, the support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect July 1, 1981." [ 1981 c 270 s 18.]

Severability—1981 c 270: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1981 c 270 s 17.]